public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.dic
òco/T0&0[0]0)0
señor/B0mfv0
paron/C0U0mf
momento/T0mfI0
fiol/T0U0mf<0<1
fioƚo/T0mf
fiòl/T0U0&0
akua/D0r2&0)0<0<1
akoa/D0&0<0<1
amor/D0r2
aria/D0r2&0<0<1§0
mar/D0(0[0]0
mexe/D0mf
kapo/T0&0
fior/D0&0)0
fògo/T0I0&0
vista/D0r2
rexultado/T0Y0
dubio/T0r2
esperiensa/D0&0
movimento/T0I0mf
volontade/T0Y0
voƚontade/T0Y0
baxo/T0&0
anemaleto/T0T2I0mf
kuadro/T0&0§0
Istade/T0Y0
Instade/T0Y0
Estade/T0Y0
estivo/B0W0I0
paso/a0E0E1E2I0J0=0-0*0.0:0&0)0
masa/D0&0[0]0
mar/D0(0[0]0
paura/D0r2
kanpo/T0I0&0<0<1
forma/D0&0[0]0
soŧetade/T0Y0
sosetade/T0Y0
soŧietade/T0Y0
sosietade/T0Y0
fiòla/D0&0
veritade/T0Y0
lengoa/D0&0[0<0<1
lengua/D0&0[0<0<1
pèŧo/T0I0(0&0
monte/T0I0mfr2[0]0
skòpo/T0[0]0
dotor/C0mf<0<1
karno/r2
elemento/T0I0mf
eƚemento/T0mf
arma/D0&0
xòja/D0r2&0
xòɉa/D0r2&0
argomento/T0I0mf
final/D0T3U0W0
lado/T0T4Y0
odor/D0&0
gato/T0I0[0]0)0
pietade/T0Y0
ŧiviltade/T0T4Y0
cave/T0&0
primo/B0W0
primèr/B0W0
primièr/B0W0
primario/B0W0
sekondario/B0W0
sekundario/B0W0
segondario/B0W0
segundario/B0W0
tèrŧiario/B0W0
tèrsiario/B0W0
kuarta/D0[0]0
kuinto/B0’0[0]0
dopio/W0&0)0
valor/D0r2
vaƚoroxo/B0W1mf
kolpo/T0&0
onbra/D0r2&0
onbría/D0r2
kavaƚa/D0&0(0
mur/T0&0[0]0
xir/T0&0[0]0
fortuna/D0[0]0<0<1
industria/D0&0
merkado/T0Y0
markado/T0Y0
korajo/T0r2
koraɉo/T0r2
koraxo/T0r2
grado/T0Y0
grada/D0Y0§0
paron/C0U0mf
pan/T0&0)0
perigoloxo/B0W0I0mf
perigoƚoxo/B0W1mf
đóvena/D0T4&0
fil/T0r2&0[0)0
kualitade/D0Y0
kuaƚitade/D0Y0
stromento/T0I0mf
fame/I0&0
ator/D0mf
atejamento/T0mfI0
ateɉamento/T0mfI0
atexamento/T0mfI0
kueƚo/T0mf
steso/B0I0W0
isteso/B0I0W0
insteso/B0I0W0
medèmo/B0W0
altro/B0W0
masa/D0&0[0]0
paƚo/T0&0(0
vantajo/T0r2*0
vantaɉo/T0r2*0
grasia/D0r2&0+0
graŧia/D0r2&0+0
insenbre/W0
bon/T0U0=0&0[0]0§0
gran/T0&0[0]0
granda/D0&0=0
pisenina/D0&0
superior/D0W0
anterior/D0W0
ŧiterior/D0T4W0
vero/T0I0W0&0
plurimamente/I0W2
otimamente/I0W2
pesimamente/I0W2
masimamente/I0W2
minimamente/I0W2
suprèmo/B0W0
infimamente/I0W2
postumamente/I0W2
ŧitimamente/T4I0W2
ultimamente/I0W2
penultimamente/I0W2
pòka/D0&0§0
pato/T0I0[0]0
òco/T0&0[0]0)0
infina/W0	po:adverb
korajo/T0r2
bèƚa/D0=0&0
malan/T0T2r2U0&0
fiol/T0mfU0<0<1
fioƚo/T0mf
novo/T0I0mf[0]0<0<1
longo/T0W0I0&0=0)0
ƚongo/T0W1=0
ƚongeto/T0W1=0
dal/T0u0&0
mòr/T0&0(0[0]0
mòra/D0&0(0[0]0
roso/T0I0mf&0
verda/D0[0]0
viòƚa/D0&0
privado/T0Y0
privada/D0Y0
perigoloxo/B0W0I0mf
perigoƚoxo/B0W1mf
car/B0*0,0&0[0]0)0
segur/T0&0
komun/D0U0W0
fàŧil/D0W0
kaldo/T0W0I0&0
prinŧipal/D0U0W0
numeroxo/B0W0I0mf
fermo/B0W0
kativo/B0W0I0
bruta/D0&0
dur/T0&0[0]0)0
ŧanko/T0I0&0
personal/D0T3U0W0
dolso/T0W0&0
spesial/D0T3U0W0
ʼbudo/T0Y0
ʼbuda/D0Y0
maƚedito/B0W1
volsudo/T0Y0‘0.0
volsuda/D0Y0‘0.0
vosudo/T0Y0‘0.0
vosuda/D0Y0‘0.0
benvosudo/T0Y0
benvosuda/D0Y0
malvosuda/D0Y0
malstado/T0Y0
movestado/T0Y0
sotostado/T0Y0
konveñerò/b0b1b2J0s0s1+0*0
dado/T0Y0+0&0
mòro/d0d1d2E0E1E2I0J0^0*0[0]0
visudo/T0Y0.0:0
soravisudo/T0Y0
skriverò/b0b1b2J0s0s1-0.0,0
iskriverò/b0b1b2J0S0
sotoskriverò/b0b1b2J0s0s1
salvar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1.0
kanpo/a0E0E1E2I0J0*0,0&0<0<1
duxerò/b0b1b2J0s0s1^0-0.0:0
produxerò/b0b1b2J0s0s1
streto/B0mfI0.0@0:0
ponerò/b0b1b2J0s0s1^0+0-0.0,0@0
konponerò/b0b1b2J0s0s1+0
posponerò/b0b1b2J0s0s1
proponerò/b0b1b2J0s0s1+0
salutar/a0a1E0E1s0s1
ordenar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1=0+0
subordenar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1
sorxerò/b0b1b2J0s0s1.0
asumerò/b0b1b2J0s0s1
tenderò/b0b1b2J0s0s1^0=0+0-0.0@0
fermo/a0E0E1E2I0J0W0
sarvar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1.0:0
solverò/b0b1b2J0s0s1s2.0-0,0@0
soludo/T0Y0.0-0,0@0
soƚudo/T0Y0.0-0,0@0
limitar/a0a1E0E1s0s1
ƚimitar/a0a2E0E2s2
legar/a0a1E0E1s0s1.0,0@0
ƚegar/a0a2E0E2s2.0,0@0
prexentar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1.0
fermo/a0E0E1E2I0J0W0
spexo/T0I0mf.0
sospenderò/b0b1b2J0s0s1
termenar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1,0
esterminar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1
sarvar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1.0:0
sperar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1,0
libarar/a0a1E0E1s0s1,0
ƚiberar/a0a2E0E2s2,0
ƚibarar/a0a2E0E2s2,0
destinguerò/b0b1b2J0s0s1
roto/B0mfI0,0
fondo/a0E0E1E2I0J0*0.0:0[0]0
fuxo/a0E0E1E2I0J0.0:0&0[0]0
koordenar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1
exortar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1
reputar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1
stuo/a0E0E1E2I0J0[0]0
vokar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1-0.0@0:0
partesipar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s1
parteŧipar/a0a1E0E1s0
prexentar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1.0
formar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1+0-0*0.0,0
notar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1+0,0
tento/a0E0E1E2I0J0r2-0*0.0@0
substentar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1
solevar/a0a1E0E1s0s1
sigo/a0E0E1E2I0J0&0
estermenar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1
formar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1+0-0*0.0,0
fondo/a0E0E1E2I0J0*0.0:0[0]0
forse/T0mf[0]0
ŧertamente/T4I0W2
konplèto/B0I0W0
probabilmente/I0W2
